District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Board of Library Trustees Technical Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. An Act To establish and provide for the maintenance of a free public library and
reading room in the District of Columbia, approved April 1, 1926 (44 Stat. 229; D.C. Official Code
§ 39-104 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 4 (D.C. Official Code § 39-104) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (g) is amended to read as follows:
“(g) Every 2 years, the Board shall elect 1 of its members to serve as its chair or president
and may elect any other officer it requires.”.
(2) Subsection (i) is amended by striking the phrase “librarian of the public library”
and inserting the phrase “Chief Librarian or Executive Director” in its place.
(b) Section 5(a) (D.C. Official Code § 39-105(a)) is amended as follows:


(1) Paragraph (9) is amended to read as follows:
“(9) Make an annual oversight report to the Mayor and the Council on the operation
of the public library for the preceding fiscal year; provided, that responses to written questions
prepared by the Council committee with jurisdiction over the public library as part of an annual
Council performance oversight process shall satisfy the requirements of this paragraph;”.
(2) Paragraph (10) is amended by striking the phrase “librarian of the public library”
wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “Chief Librarian or Executive Director of the public
library” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (14)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B)(i) Revenue-generating activity may be conducted by private users only
with a fee-based use permit granted by the Board or its designee, subject to such conditions as the
Board or its designee may impose, and only upon payment of a fee pursuant to a fee schedule
approved by the Board.
(ii) The library may waive the fee required by this subparagraph if,
in the Board or its designee’s sole discretion, doing so is in the public interest and payment of the
fee would impose undue hardship on the private user.
(iii) This subparagraph shall not apply to activities conducted
pursuant to Paragraph (17) of this subsection.”.
(c) Section 107a(a) (D.C. Official Code § 39–107a) is amended by striking the phrase
“librarian of the public library” and inserting the phrase “Chief Librarian or Executive Director or
his or her designees” in its place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (12 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council overriding the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).